New Jersey, session 222, S1456.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established a New Jersey Higher Education Student Advisory Commission in, but not of, the Department of State.  The commission shall consist of 14 members including: three student representatives from the State colleges and universities established pursuant to chapter 64 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, a student representative from each of the four public research universities, three student representatives from the county colleges, three student representatives from the independent colleges and universities, and one student representative from a proprietary degree-granting institution. The New Jersey Education Association shall appoint one member who is a member of the NJEA Preservice Program and represents any one of the higher education sectors, and the Secretary of Higher Education shall appoint the remaining members. b.    A student enrolled in an institution of higher education or a proprietary degree-granting institution in the State may submit an application to serve on the commission to the Secretary of Higher Education.  The application shall detail the students experience as a campus leader and shall include a letter of recommendation from the president of the institution of higher education or the proprietary institution at which the student is enrolled.  The secretary in making the appointments shall attempt to provide a balanced representation of the geographic regions of the State. c.     Appointments to the commission shall be made for a term of one year, although the secretary may reappoint a student for additional terms.  The secretary shall make every effort to ensure that at least one member is reappointed to the commission from the prior years membership. d.    Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments are made.  Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. e.     The members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the commission for its purposes. 2.    The commission shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of its members, but no later than 60 days after the effective date of this act.  The commission shall choose a chairperson from among its members and shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the commission.  The commission shall meet a minimum of three times each year.  The minutes of each meeting shall be posted on the Office of the Secretary of Higher Educations website. 3.    The Office of the Secretary of Higher Education shall provide such stenographic, clerical, and other administrative assistants, and such professional staff as the commission requires to carry out its work.  The commission also shall be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available for its purposes. 4.    It shall be the responsibility of the commission to advise the secretary on system-wide issues of concern to students, which shall include, but are not limited to, the following issues: affordability of postsecondary education, student mental health, and campus safety.  The commission shall annually report to the Assembly Higher Education Committee and the Senate Higher Education Committee, or their successor committees on the concerns, perspectives, and experiences of students attending institutions of higher education and proprietary degree-granting institutions in the State and may make recommendations on suggested legislative initiatives. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.